Mississippi, session 2026, HB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following words and phrases have the meanings as provided in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Smart meter" or "advanced metering infrastructure" means a meter for electricity usage that operates on smart meter technology. (b)  "Smart meter technology" means technology, including metering technology and network communications technology capable of bidirectional communication, that records electricity usage on at least an hourly basis, including related electric distribution system upgrades to enable the technology. SECTION 2. (1)  Smart meter technology shall provide customers with direct access to and use of price and consumption information.  The technology shall also: (a)  Directly provide customers with information on their hourly consumption. (b)  Enable time-of-use rates and real-time price programs. (c)  Effectively support the automatic control of the customer's electricity consumption by one or more of the following as selected by the customer: (i)  The customer; (ii)  The customer's utility; or (iii)  A third party engaged by the customer or the customer's utility. (2)  Electric distribution companies shall furnish smart meter technology as follows: (a)  In new building construction, the electric distribution company shall give the customer the choice of either an analog meter or a smart meter.  The electric distribution company shall document in writing the choice made by the customer according to a procedure adopted for that purpose by the electric distribution company.  If no choice is made by the customer, the electric distribution company shall install an analog meter. (b)  A customer has the right to opt out, at any time, of a previously installed smart meter according to a procedure adopted for that purpose by the electric distribution company. (c)  An electric distribution company may not charge a customer a fee for exercising the right to opt out of a smart meter under paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). (3)  If a customer opts out of a smart meter under paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the electric distribution company shall install an analog meter. (4)  An electric distribution company shall include information about the procedure for customers to opt out of smart meters on its publicly accessible Internet website, and make such information available to customers who call customer support. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.